Utah statutes.
13-10a-3.   Access to repertoire.

(1)  Each performing rights society or organization licensing music in the state shall:

(a)  maintain a current electronic list of the titles and names of the authors and publishers of all performed copyrighted musical works for which the performing rights society collects royalties on behalf of copyright owners;

(b)  update the list at least quarterly; and

(c)  provide to the division the electronic address at which the list may be viewed.

(2)  Upon request, any person may review the list, in electronic form, of copyrighted works through the division.

(3)  Each performing rights society or organization shall provide an electronic or printed copy of its most current lists of copyrighted musical works and members at cost, not including the cost of maintaining the database or any other overhead, to any person upon request.

(4)  Each performing rights society or organization licensing music in this state shall establish and maintain a toll free telephone number which can be used to answer inquiries regarding specific musical works licensed by that performing rights society and the copyright owners represented by the performing rights society or organization.

